Utah statutes.
76-6a-3.   Schemes prohibited -- Violation as deceptive consumer sales
practice -- Prosecution of civil violations.
(1) A person may not participate in, organize, establish, promote, or
administer any pyramid scheme.
(2)  A criminal conviction under this chapter is prima facie evidence of a
violation of Section 13-11-4, the Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act.
(3)  Any violation of this chapter constitutes a violation of Section 13-11-4,
the Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act.
(4)  All civil violations of this chapter shall be investigated and prosecuted
as prescribed by the Utah Consumer Sales Practices Act.
